Virginia statutes. Title 8.8A. Commercial Code — Investment Securities.
PART 6. Transition Provisions.

§ 8.8A-601.
Savings clause.

This title does not affect an action or proceeding commenced before January 1, 1997.

If a security interest in a security is perfected on January 1, 1997, and the action by which the security interest was perfected would suffice to perfect a security interest under this title, no further action is required to continue perfection.If a security interest in a security is perfected on January 1, 1997, but the action by which the security interest was perfected would not suffice to perfect a security interest under this title, the security interest remains perfected for a period of four months, until May 1, 1997, and continues perfected thereafter if appropriate action to perfect under this title is taken within that period.If a security interest is perfected on January 1, 1997, and the security interest can be perfected by filing under this title, a financing statement signed by the secured party instead of the debtor may be filed within that period to continue perfection or thereafter to perfect.

History.

1996, c. 216.

Editor’s note.

This section is numbered § 8-603 in the uniform act, which contains a § 8-601 (effective date provision) and a § 8-602 (repeals).